Utah statutes.
53A-24-301.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Blind" means an individual, or class of individuals, whose central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses, or whose visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is accompanied by a limit to the field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest diameter subtends an angle of no greater than 20 degrees.

(2)  "Visual impairment" means an impairment of visual functions which is sufficient that the impairment constitutes or, if not corrected, will constitute a material limitation to normal activities or functioning.

